Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 41. Unified Towns and Gores in Essex County

§ 1351.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Appraisers” means the appraisers for the unified towns and gores in Essex County, designated in section 1355 of this title.

“Board of Governors” means the Board of Governors for the unified towns and gores in Essex County, elected in section 1351a of this title.

“Gores” means the unified towns and gores in Essex County, or any one of them.

“Supervisor” means the supervisor for the unified towns and gores in Essex County, appointed in section 1351b of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 331

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1999, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2000;

2003, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1351a.
Board of Governors.

The Board of Governors shall be composed of three individuals residing in the gores. At each annual meeting, the residents of the gores shall elect a member, who shall serve for a term of three years, for each expired term. A vacancy on the Board shall be filled at the next annual meeting in a manner to retain staggered terms.

The residents of the gores may vote at an annual or special meeting to elect not more than two additional members of the Board of Governors for terms of two years each. When the additional members are first elected, one shall be elected for one year and the other member shall be elected for two years. Terms of these additional members shall end on annual meeting days. If the additional members are elected at a special meeting, the term of those elected for one year shall expire on the next annual meeting day and the term of those elected for two years shall expire on the second annual meeting day following their election. A vote establishing additional members of the Board of Governors shall remain in effect until the residents of the gores vote to discontinue the positions at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2000; amended

2003, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1351b.
Functions and duties of Board of Governors.

The Board of Governors shall hire, direct, or fire one or more supervisors for the gores who shall reside in Essex County, and who shall not be a current member of the Board of Governors. The Board of Governors shall oversee the Supervisor or supervisors in the execution of the Supervisor’s functions and duties.

The Board of Governors shall appoint the appraisers. Each of the appraisers shall be a resident of Essex County.

The Board of Governors shall perform the same functions and duties for the gores that a selectboard, school board, and board of civil authority perform for their municipality.
(c) (1) The Board of Governors shall perform the same functions and duties for the gores that a selectboard, school board, and board of civil authority perform for their municipality.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the Board of Governors shall enjoy the same powers, privileges and immunities, and fees, and shall be subject to the same obligations, limitation, liabilities, and penalties in respect to the gores, as a selectboard, school board, and board of civil authority enjoy and are subject to in respect to their municipality.

The unified towns and gores of Essex County shall be a “municipal corporation” under subsection 1751(a) of this title and shall have the authority to incur debt, issue bonds, and borrow money in accordance with the provisions of chapter 53 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2000; amended

2003, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 4

, § 1;

2017, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 11, 2018.

§ 1352.
Repealed. 1999, No. 139 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2000.

§ 1353.
Functions and duties of supervisor.

The supervisor or supervisors shall perform the same functions and duties for the gores that the truant officer, constable, treasurer, collector of taxes, and town clerk perform for their municipality.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the supervisor or supervisors shall enjoy the same powers, privileges, immunities, and fees, and shall be subject to the same obligations, limitations, liabilities, and penalties in respect to the gores, as the truant officer, constable, treasurer, collector of taxes, and town clerk enjoy and are subject to in respect to their municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 331

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1999, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2000;

2003, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 1354.
Accounts; annual report.

The supervisor or supervisors shall maintain an account showing in detail the revenue raised and the expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of the supervisor’s duties. The supervisor or supervisors shall prepare an annual fiscal report on or before July 1 which shall conform to procedural and substantive requirements to be established by the Board of Governors and which, upon approval by the Board of Governors, shall be distributed to the residents of the gores.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 331

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1969, No. 219

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 27, 1970;

1977, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2000;

2003, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

2015, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 27.

§ 1355.
Appraisers.

Subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Property Valuation and Review, the supervisor shall appoint for the year 1973: one appraiser for a term of three years; one appraiser for a term of two years; and one appraiser for a term of one year. For each year thereafter, the Board of Governors shall annually appoint one appraiser for a term of three years. The Board of Governors may revoke any appointment made under this section and shall, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Property Valuation and Review, fill any vacancy in the Board of Appraisers.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 331

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1973, No. 58

, § 2, eff. April 1, 1973;

1977, No. 105

, § 14(b);

1999, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2000.

§ 1356.
Functions and duties of Board of Appraisers.

The Board of Appraisers shall perform the same functions and duties for the unified towns and gores of Essex County that listers perform for their municipality.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the appraisers shall enjoy the same powers, privileges, immunities, and remuneration and shall be subject to the same obligations, limitations, liabilities, and penalties in respect to the unified towns and gores of Essex County as listers enjoy and are subject to in respect to their municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 331

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1999, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2000;

2017, No. 74

, § 76.